es: Diseño de red: Fijo; Plegable; Retráctil; Otro
tr: Ağ tasarımı: Sabit; Katlanabilir; Geri çekilebilir; Diğer
ru: Конструкция сетки: Фиксированная; Складная; Выдвижная; Другое
cs: Návrh sítě: Pevný; Skládací; Stahovací; Ostatní
fr: Type de construction du filet: Fixe; Pliable; Rétractable; Autre
it: Tipo di struttura della rete: Fisso; Pieghevole; Retrattile; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός δικτύου: Σταθερό; Αναδιπλούμενο; Ανασυρόμενο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Zasnova mreže: Fiksno; Zložljivo; Uvlečno; Drugo
sv: Nätdesign: Fast; Hopfällbar; Indragbar; Övrigt
de: Netzdesign: Fixiert; Faltbar; Einziehbar; Sonstiges
en: Net design: Fixed; Foldable; Retractable; Other
pl: Konstrukcja siatki: Stała; Składana; Zwijana; Inne
bg-BG: Дизайн на мрежата: Фиксиран; Сгъваем; Прибиращ се; Друго
fi: Verkon rakenne: Kiinteä; Taittuva; Sisäänvedettävä; Muu
th: การออกแบบตาข่าย: ตายตัว; พับได้; ยืดหดได้; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Dizajn mreže: Fiksno; Sklopivo; Uvlačivo; Ostalo
hu: Háló kialakítása: Rögzített; Összecsukható; Visszahúzható; Egyéb
ja: ネットデザイン: 固定式; 折りたたみ式; 格納式; その他
nl: Net ontwerp: Vast; Opvouwbaar; Inschuifbaar; Anders
lt-LT: Tinklo dizainas: Fiksuotas; Sulankstomas; Ištraukiamas; Kita
zh-CN: 网眼设计: 固定式; 可折叠; 可伸缩; 其他
ro-RO: Designul plasei: Fix; Pliabil; Retractabil; Altele
nb: Nettdesign: Fast; Sammenleggbar; Uttrekkbar; Annet
pt-PT: Design de rede: Fixo; Dobrável; Retrátil; Outro
pt-BR: Rede design: Fixo; Dobrável; Retrátil; Outro
zh-TW: 網具設計: 固定式; 可折疊; 可伸縮; 其他
ko: 넷 디자인: 고정식; 접이식; 리트랙터블; 기타
sk-SK: Dizajn siete: Pevný; Skladací; Zasúvací; Iné
vi: Thiết kế mạng: Cố định; Có thể gập gọn; Có thể thu gọn; Khác
da: Netdesign: Fast; Sammenfoldelig; Udtrækkelig; Andet